Utah statutes.
41-1a-602.   Application for original registration.
(1) (a)  If a vehicle is of a type subject to registration but has not been
registered and no certificate of title has been issued, or if the vehicle has
been registered or titled in another state or country, the owner shall file an
application in the form for an original registration and issuance of an
original certificate of title.
(b)  If the vehicle ownership has changed, the owner shall file an application
in the form for an original certificate of title.
(2)  Each application shall be accompanied by all applicable taxes and fees
under Part 12, Fee and Tax Requirements.
